District of Columbia statutes.
42-3131.11

Notice of vacancy designation and right to appeal.

The Mayor shall identify nonregistered vacant buildings in the District, excluding vacant buildings identified in § 42-3131.08, and blighted vacant buildings. The owner shall be notified that the owner’s building has been designated as a vacant building or as a blighted vacant building and of the owner’s right to appeal.

Apr. 14, 1906, 34 Stat. 115, ch. 1626, § 11
as added Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-281, § 101, 48 DCR 1888
June 5, 2003, D.C. Law 14-307, § 1302, 49 DCR 11664
Oct. 18, 2005, D.C. Law 16-24, § 4(b), 52 DCR 8080
Aug. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-216, § 3(g), 55 DCR 7500
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223,§ 2042(e), 57 DCR 6242
This section is referenced in § 42-3131.14.
D.C. Law 14-307, in subsec. (a)(1), substituted “real properties, as identified on the cadastral maps of the Office of Tax and Revenue according to square, parcel, or reservation, and lot,” for “building addresses”; and added subsec. (a)(3).
D.C. Law 16-24, in subsec. (a)(2), substituted “quarterly” for “semiannual”.
D.C. Law 17-216 rewrote the section.
D.C. Law 18-223 rewrote the section, which had read as follows: “The Mayor shall identify nonregistered vacant buildings in the District, excluding vacant buildings identified in § 42-3131.08. The owner shall be notified that the owner’s building has been designated as vacant and of the owner’s right to appeal.”
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 4(b) of Abatement of Nuisance Construction Projects Temporary Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Law 16-4, May 14, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 5427).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(g) of Nuisance Properties Abatement Reform and Real Property Classification Temporary Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-259, March 8, 2007, law notification 54 DCR 3044).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(g) of Nuisance Properties Abatement Reform and Real Property Classification Temporary Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Law 17-102, February 2, 2008, law notification 55 DCR 4254).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Real Property Tax Reform Temporary Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Law 18-153, May 22, 2010, law notification 57 DCR 5381).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 1302 and 1304 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-544, December 4, 2002, 49 DCR 11700).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 1302 and 1304 of the Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-27, February 24, 2003, 50 DCR 2151).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 1302 and 1304 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-103, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5499).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(b) of Abatement of Nuisance Construction Projects Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-42, February 17, 2005, 52 DCR 3045).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(g) of Nuisance Properties Abatement Reform and Real Property Classification Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-586, December 28, 2006, 54 DCR 353).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(g) of Nuisance Properties Abatement Reform and Real Property Classification Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-173, November 2, 2007, 54 DCR 11204).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(g) of Nuisance Properties Abatement Reform and Real Property Classification Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-436, July 16, 2008, 55 DCR 8272).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b), of Real Property Tax Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-313, February 22, 2010, 57 DCR 1645).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2042(e) of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
Application of Law 14-307: Section 1304 of D.C. Law 14-307 provided: “Sections 1302 and 1303 shall apply as of October 1, 2002.”